Utah statutes.
53A-15-1004.   Student eligibility for enrollment.

(1)  Utah students at any age or in any grade may enroll in Electronic High School courses.

(2)  The Electronic High School shall accept students into courses on a first-come first-served basis.



Enacted by Chapter 227, 2006 General Session

